Utah statutes.
53B-18-101.   Agricultural experiment station.

(1)  There is established an agricultural experiment station in connection with Utah State University.

(2)  The station conducts research as provided by state and federal laws governing the establishment and maintenance of agricultural experiment stations.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

